Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7437.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-41.2-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-41.2 entitled
"Automated Traffic Violation Monitoring Systems" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-41.2-3. Automated traffic violation monitoring systems. [Effective until January
15, 2027.] Automated traffic violation monitoring systems. [Effective until January 15, 2030.]
(a) The state department of transportation and the municipalities of this state are hereby
authorized to install and operate automated traffic violation detection systems. Such systems shall
be limited to systems which monitor and detect violations of traffic control signals. For purposes
of this chapter an automated traffic violation detection system means a system with one or more
motor vehicle sensors which produces images of motor vehicles being operated in violation of
traffic signal laws. A municipality shall be permitted to install, at up to no more than three (3)
designated “Don’t Block the Box” intersections within the municipality, an automated traffic
detection system to monitor violations of § 31-15-12.2; provided, however, that the provisions
allowing such “Don’t Block the Box” monitoring shall sunset on January 15, 2027 2030, at which
time such use as provided in this section shall no longer be permitted.
(b) No automated traffic violation detection system shall be installed pursuant to this
section which has not been approved for use by the director of the state department of
transportation. The director of the state department of transportation shall promulgate regulations
for the approval and operation of said systems pursuant to the administrative procedures act, chapter

35 of title 42. Systems shall be approved if the director is satisfied they meet standards of efficiency
and accuracy. All systems installed for use under this chapter must be able to record the image of
the vehicle and the license plates of the vehicle.
(c) In the event that the system is to be installed other than by the state department of
transportation on state-maintained streets or roads, the director of the department of transportation
must approve such installation.
(d) The state department of transportation and/or the municipalities may enter into an
agreement with a private corporation or other entity to provide automated traffic violation detection
systems or equipment and to maintain such systems.
(e) Compensation to a private entity that provides traffic signal monitoring devices shall
be based on the value of such equipment and related support services, and shall not be based on the
revenue generated by such systems.
(f) Use of the images or video captured by an automated traffic violation monitoring system
shall be restricted to enforcement of the traffic violation and shall not be used to track individuals
or vehicles for any purpose. All recorded images or video shall be destroyed or retained consistent
with the provisions of § 31-41.2-8.
(g) Absent a judicial warrant, the images, recordings, metadata, license plate information,
or other information collected by, or obtained from, an automated traffic violation monitoring
system shall not be sold, shared, or transferred to any third parties, including other government
agencies, by the department of transportation or municipalities except for enforcement of the traffic
violation.
31-41.2-3. Automated traffic violation monitoring systems. [Effective January 15,
2027.] Automated traffic violation monitoring systems. [Effective January 15, 2030.]
(a) The Effective January 15, 2030, the state department of transportation and the
municipalities of this state are hereby authorized to install and operate automated traffic violation
detection systems. Such systems shall be limited to systems which monitor and detect violations of
traffic control signals. For purposes of this chapter an automated traffic violation detection system
means a system with one or more motor vehicle sensors which produces images of motor vehicles
being operated in violation of traffic signal laws.
(b) No automated traffic violation detection system shall be installed pursuant to this
section which has not been approved for use by the director of the state department of
transportation. The director of the state department of transportation shall promulgate regulations
for the approval and operation of said systems pursuant to the administrative procedures act, chapter
35 of title 42. Systems shall be approved if the director is satisfied they meet standards of efficiency
LC004258 - Page 2 of 4

and accuracy. All systems installed for use under this chapter must be able to record the image of
the vehicle and the license plates of the vehicle.
(c) In the event that the system is to be installed other than by the state department of
transportation on state-maintained streets or roads, the director of the department of transportation
must approve such installation.
(d) The state department of transportation and/or the municipalities may enter into an
agreement with a private corporation or other entity to provide automated traffic violation detection
systems or equipment and to maintain such systems.
(e) Compensation to a private entity that provides traffic signal monitoring devices shall
be based on the value of such equipment and related support services, and shall not be based on the
revenue generated by such systems.
(f) Use of the images or video captured by an automated traffic violation monitoring system
shall be restricted to enforcement of the traffic violation and shall not be used to track individuals
or vehicles for any purpose. All recorded images or video shall be destroyed or retained consistent
with the provisions of § 31-41.2-8.
(g) Absent a judicial warrant, the images, recordings, metadata, license plate information,
or other information collected by, or obtained from, an automated traffic violation monitoring
system shall not be sold, shared, or transferred to any third parties, including other government
agencies, by the department of transportation or municipalities except for enforcement of the traffic
violation.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004258
========
LC004258 - Page 3 of 4